New Jersey, session 222, S3202.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.19:28-1 is amended to read as follows: 19:28-1.  a.  When any candidate at any election shall have reason to believe that an error has been made in counting the votes of that election, the candidate may, within a period of 3 days after the certification of the results of the election, apply to a judge of the Superior Court assigned to the county wherein such district or districts are located, for a recount of the votes cast at the election in any district or districts. b.  When ten voters at any election shall have reason to believe that an error has been so made in counting the votes upon any public question at any election, such voters may, within a period of 3 days after the certification of the results of the election, apply to a judge of the Superior Court assigned to the county wherein such district or districts are located, for a recount of the votes cast at the election in any district or districts on such public question. c.     When the results of any election for county or municipal office show that the election was decided by a vote differential of 10 votes or less, a candidate may request the appropriate board of elections or boards of elections to conduct an automatic recount of the votes cast at the election in any district or districts.  The candidate shall make the recount request within 24 hours after the certification of the results of that election. The recount shall occur not later than three days after the certification of the results of that election. The appropriate board of elections or boards of elections, or persons designated by those boards, shall conduct the automatic recount.  The State shall incur the costs of conducting an automatic recount required pursuant to this subsection. (cf: P.L.2023, c.124, s.5) 2.  (New section)  a. Notwithstanding any provision of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Chief Justice of the New Jersey Supreme Court may annually assign, not later than the Tuesday after Labor Day, a minimum of three Superior Court judges for each of the following designated geographic regions to hear and adjudicate all election recount and contest matters arising under chapter 28 or chapter 29 of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes within each region: (1) the Northern Region, containing the counties of Union, Hudson, Essex, Morris, Bergen, Passaic, Warren, and Sussex; (2) the Central Region, containing the counties of Hunterdon, Mercer, Middlesex, and Somerset; and (3) the Southern Region, containing the counties of Monmouth, Burlington, Ocean, Camden, Atlantic, Cape May, Monmouth, Gloucester, and Cumberland. b.  In creating the regions and determining the number of judges to assign to each region pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the Chief Justice shall take into account any criteria the Chief Justice deems appropriate, including, but not limited to: (1) the population of each region; (2) prior election recount and contest volume; and (3) election year voter turnout. At the Chief Justices discretion, a county assigned to a region pursuant to subsection a. of this section may be assigned to a different geographically contiguous region in any given year. Upon issuing the regions, the number of judges, and their names assigned to each region each year, the Chief Justice shall cause this information to be published on the official website of the Judiciary Branch. c.  In hearing and adjudicating election recount and contest matters, a judge assigned to a region shall act individually and not as a panel. If an election recount or contest is filed that arises from one of the counties in a particular region, the next available judge in that region shall be assigned that case. The assignment of election recount and contest cases shall not be limited to a judge in the county of origin, rather to the availability of a judge in the region containing that county to hear the matter immediately. 3.  (New section)  Notwithstanding any provision of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, all matters related to an election recount or an election contest pursuant to chapter 28 or chapter 29 of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, respectively, shall be heard and adjudicated prior to the assumption of office of the elected candidate, or the reorganization of the governing body to which the elected candidate was elected, as the case may be. All pleadings shall be given an initial hearing within 36 hours of an initial filing. All appeals shall be given an initial hearing within 24 hours, or the next business day, of the appeals filing. As used in this subsection, business day means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or State or federal holiday. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.